Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-131
License, certificate, permit, or registration; duty to carry, present for inspection, and exhibit.

The federal license, certificate, or permit, and the evidence of registration in this or another state, if any, required for an airman shall be kept in the personal possession of the airman when the airman is operating within this state and must be presented for inspection upon the demand of any passenger, peace officer of this state, authorized official or employee of the division, or official, manager, or person in charge of any airport in this state upon which the airman shall land or the reasonable request of any other person. The federal aircraft license, certificate, or permit required for aircraft must be carried in every aircraft operating in this state at all times and must be conspicuously posted therein where it may readily be seen by passengers or inspectors and must be presented for inspection upon the demand of any passenger, peace officer of this state, authorized official or employee of the division, or official, manager, or person in charge of any airport in this state upon which the airman shall land or the reasonable request of any person.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 9(4), p. 92;

Laws 1973, LB 341, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 27.